Illinois, session 104th, HB5055.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 14-12.5 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/14-12.5)7    Sec. 14-12.5. Hospital rate updates. 8    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 9hospital rates of reimbursement authorized under Sections 105-5.05, 14-12, and 14-13 of this Code shall be adjusted in 11accordance with the provisions of this Section.12    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 13effective for dates of service on and after January 1, 2024, 14subject to federal approval, hospital reimbursement rates 15shall be revised as follows:16        (1) For inpatient general acute care services, the 17    statewide-standardized amount and the per diem rates for 18    hospitals exempt from the APR-DRG reimbursement system, in 19    effect January 1, 2023, shall be increased by 10%.20        (2) For inpatient psychiatric services:21            (A) For safety-net hospitals, the hospital 22        specific per diem rate in effect January 1, 2023 and 23        the minimum per diem rate of $630, authorized in   HB5055- 2 -LRB104 18298 KTG 31738 b1        subsection (b-5) of Section 5-5.05 of this Code, shall 2        be increased by 10%.3            (B) For all general acute care hospitals that are 4        not safety-net hospitals, the inpatient psychiatric 5        care per diem rates in effect January 1, 2023 shall be 6        increased by 10%, except that all rates shall be at 7        least 90% of the minimum inpatient psychiatric care 8        per diem rate for safety-net hospitals as authorized 9        in subsection (b-5) of Section 5-5.05 of this Code 10        including the adjustments authorized in this Section. 11        The statewide default per diem rate for a hospital 12        opening a new psychiatric distinct part unit, shall be 13        set at 90% of the minimum inpatient psychiatric care 14        per diem rate for safety-net hospitals as authorized 15        in subsection (b-5) of Section 5-5.05 of this Code, 16        including the adjustment authorized in this Section.17            (C) For all psychiatric specialty hospitals, the 18        per diem rates in effect January 1, 2023, shall be 19        increased by 10%, except that all rates shall be at 20        least 90% of the minimum inpatient per diem rate for 21        safety-net hospitals as authorized in subsection (b-5) 22        of Section 5-5.05 of this Code, including the 23        adjustments authorized in this Section. The statewide 24        default per diem rate for a new psychiatric specialty 25        hospital shall be set at 90% of the minimum inpatient 26        psychiatric care per diem rate for safety-net   HB5055- 3 -LRB104 18298 KTG 31738 b1        hospitals as authorized in subsection (b-5) of Section 2        5-5.05 of this Code, including the adjustment 3        authorized in this Section.4        (3) For inpatient rehabilitative services, all 5    hospital specific per diem rates in effect January 1, 6    2023, shall be increased by 10%. The statewide default 7    inpatient rehabilitative services per diem rates, for 8    general acute care hospitals and for rehabilitation 9    specialty hospitals respectively, shall be increased by 10    10%.11        (4) The statewide-standardized amount for outpatient 12    general acute care services in effect January 1, 2023, 13    shall be increased by 10%.14        (5) The statewide-standardized amount for outpatient 15    psychiatric care services in effect January 1, 2023, shall 16    be increased by 10%.17        (6) The statewide-standardized amount for outpatient 18    rehabilitative care services in effect January 1, 2023, 19    shall be increased by 10%.20        (7) The per diem rate in effect January 1, 2023, as 21    authorized in subsection (a) of Section 14-13 of this 22    Article shall be increased by 10%.23        (8) For services provided on and after January 1, 2024 24    through June 30, 2024, and on and after January 1, 2027, 25    subject to federal approval, in addition to the statewide 26    standardized amount, an add-on payment of at least $210   HB5055- 4 -LRB104 18298 KTG 31738 b1    shall be paid for each inpatient General Acute and 2    Psychiatric day of care, excluding Medicare-Medicaid dual 3    eligible crossover days, for all safety-net hospitals 4    defined in Section 5-5e.1 of this Code.5            (A) For Psychiatric days of care, the Department 6        may implement payment of this add-on by increasing the 7        hospital specific psychiatric per diem rate, adjusted 8        in accordance with subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) 9        of subsection (b) by $210, or by a separate add-on 10        payment.11            (B) If the add-on adjustment is added to the 12        hospital specific psychiatric per diem rate to 13        operationalize payment, the Department shall provide a 14        rate sheet to each safety-net hospital, which 15        identifies the hospital psychiatric per diem rate 16        before and after the adjustment.17            (C) The add-on adjustment shall not be considered 18        when setting the 90% minimum rate identified in 19        paragraph (2) of subsection (b).20        (9) For services provided on and after July 1, 2024, 21    and on or before December 31, 2026, subject to federal 22    approval, in addition to the statewide standardized amount 23    and any other payments authorized under this Code, a 24    safety-net hospital health care equity add-on payment 25    shall be paid for each inpatient General Acute and 26    Psychiatric day of care, excluding Medicare-Medicaid dual   HB5055- 5 -LRB104 18298 KTG 31738 b1    eligible crossover days, for safety-net hospitals defined 2    in Section 5-5e.1 of this Code, as follows:3            (A) if the safety-net hospital's Medicaid 4        inpatient utilization rate, as calculated under 5        Section 5-5e.1 of this Code, is equal to or greater 6        than 70%, the add-on payment shall be $425;7            (B) if the safety-net hospital's Medicaid 8        inpatient utilization rate, as calculated under 9        Section 5-5e.1 of this Code, is equal to or greater 10        than 50% and less than 70%, the add-on payment shall be 11        $300;12            (C) if the safety-net hospital's Medicaid 13        inpatient utilization rate, as calculated under 14        Section 5-5e.1 of this Code, is equal to or greater 15        than 40% and less than 50%, the add-on payment shall be 16        $225; and17            (D) if the safety-net hospital's Medicaid 18        inpatient utilization rate, as calculated under 19        Section 5-5e.1 of this Code, is less than 40%, the 20        add-on payment shall be $210.21        Qualification for the safety-net hospital health care 22    equity add-on payment shall be updated January 1, 2026, 23    based on the MIUR determination effective 3 months prior 24    to the start of the January 1, 2026 calendar year.25        Rates described in subparagraphs (A) through (C) shall 26    be adjusted annually beginning January 1, 2026 by applying   HB5055- 6 -LRB104 18298 KTG 31738 b1    a uniform factor to each rate to spend an approximate 2    amount of $50,000,000 annually per year using State fiscal 3    year 2024 days as a basis for calendar year 2026 rates. 4        The add-on adjustment under this paragraph shall not 5    be considered when setting the 90% minimum rate identified 6    in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).7        (10) For services provided on and after July 1, 2024, 8    and on or before December 31, 2026, subject to federal 9    approval, in addition to the statewide standardized amount 10    and any other payments authorized under this Code, a 11    safety-net hospital low volume add-on payment of $200 12    shall be paid for each inpatient General Acute and 13    Psychiatric day of care, excluding Medicare-Medicaid dual 14    eligible crossover days, for any safety-net hospital as 15    defined in Section 5-5e.1 that provided less than 11,000 16    Medicaid inpatient days of care, excluding 17    Medicare-Medicaid dual eligible crossover days, in the 18    base period. As used in this paragraph, "base period" 19    means State fiscal year 2022 admissions received by the 20    Department prior to October 1, 2023 for the payment period 21    July 1, 2024 through December 31, 2025, and beginning in 22    calendar year 2026, the State fiscal year that ends 30 23    months before the applicable calendar year, such as State 24    fiscal year 2023 admissions received by the Department 25    prior to October 1, 2024, for calendar year 2026.26    (c) The Department shall take all actions necessary to   HB5055- 7 -LRB104 18298 KTG 31738 b1ensure the changes authorized in Public Act 103-102 and this 2amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly are in effect for 3dates of service on and after the effective date of the changes 4made to this Section by this amendatory Act of the 103rd 5General Assembly, including publishing all appropriate public 6notices, applying for federal approval of amendments to the 7Illinois Title XIX State Plan, and adopting administrative 8rules if necessary.9    (d) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services may 10adopt rules necessary to implement the changes made by Public 11Act 103-102 and this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 12Assembly through the use of emergency rulemaking in accordance 13with Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 14Act. The 24-month limitation on the adoption of emergency 15rules does not apply to rules adopted under this Section. The 16General Assembly finds that the adoption of rules to implement 17the changes made by Public Act 103-102 and this amendatory Act 18of the 103rd General Assembly is deemed an emergency and 19necessary for the public interest, safety, and welfare.20    (e) The Department shall ensure that all necessary 21adjustments to the managed care organization capitation base 22rates necessitated by the adjustments in this Section are 23completed, published, and applied in accordance with Section 245-30.8 of this Code 90 days prior to the implementation date of 25the changes required under Public Act 103-102 and this 26amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly.  HB5055- 8 -LRB104 18298 KTG 31738 b1    (f) The Department shall publish updated rate sheets or 2add-on payment amounts, as applicable, for all hospitals 30 3days prior to the effective date of the rate increase, or 4within 30 days after federal approval by the Centers for 5Medicare and Medicaid Services, whichever is later. 6(Source: P.A. 103-102, eff. 6-16-23; 103-593, eff. 6-7-24.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.